Illinois, session 104th, SB1224.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Fantasy Sports Consumer Protection Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Adjusted gross fantasy contest receipts" means the amount 8equal to the total of all entry fees that a fantasy contest 9operator collects from all participants less only the total of 10all prizes paid out as prizes to all participants multiplied 11by the location percentage for this State.12    "Board" means the Illinois Gaming Board.13    "Entry fee" means a nonrefundable cash or cash equivalent 14that is paid by a participant and set in advance by a fantasy 15contest operator granting the participant the right to 16participate in a fantasy contest.17    "Fantasy contest" means an online fantasy or simulated 18game or contest of skill with an entry fee in which:19        (1) the values of all prizes offered to a winning 20    participant are established and made known to the 21    participant in advance of the contest;22        (2) all winning outcomes reflect the relative 23    knowledge and skill of the participant;  SB1224- 2 -LRB104 06316 LNS 16351 b1        (3) the participant assembles, owns, or manages a 2    fictional entry or roster of actual professional or 3    amateur athletes, in real-world sports events, or an 4    organized video game competition that is regulated by a 5    governing body and that is held between professional 6    players who play individually or as teams;7        (4) a participant competes for prizes awarded by a 8    fantasy contest operator based on terms and conditions 9    published by the fantasy contest operator and made known 10    to the participant in advance of the contest;11        (5) winning outcomes are determined solely by clearly 12    established scoring criteria based on one or more 13    statistical results of the performance of an individual 14    athlete, including, but not limited to, a fantasy score; 15    and16        (6) no winning outcome is entirely based on the score, 17    point spread, or any performance of any single actual team 18    or combination of teams or solely on any single 19    performance of an individual athlete or player in any 20    single actual event. 21"Fantasy contest" includes both contests wherein participants 22compete against each other and contests wherein only a single 23participant competes against a target score set by the fantasy 24contest operator. "Fantasy contest" does not include any 25fantasy contest without an entry fee.26    "Fantasy contest operator" means a person or entity that   SB1224- 3 -LRB104 06316 LNS 16351 b1offers fantasy contests to members of the public. "Fantasy 2contest operator" does not include an Internet service 3provider or a provider of mobile data services merely as a 4result of that entity's transporting general traffic that may 5include a fantasy contest and does not include a fantasy 6contest participant by virtue of doing any combination of the 7following: (i) setting house rules for a contest; (ii) 8assigning a salary or target score to any eligible athlete or 9player; (iii) accepting an entry fee from a fantasy contest 10participant; or (iv) awarding or disbursing prizes in 11conformance with this Act.12    "Location percentage" means the percentage rounded to the 13nearest 0.1% of the total entry fees collected from players 14located in this State, divided by the total entry fees 15collected from all players in the fantasy contest.16    "Participant" means an individual who participates in a 17fantasy contest offered by a fantasy contest operator.18    "Prohibited participant" means an individual who has 19self-excluded under Section 45 or an athlete, coach, referee, 20trainer, or team staff when there is direct involvement of the 21athlete, coach, referee, trainer, or staff; the athlete's or 22staff's team; or the athletes that the coach coaches or the 23trainer trains.24    "Qualified applicant" means an applicant for a license 25under this Act whose application meets the mandatory minimum 26qualification criteria as required by the Board.   SB1224- 4 -LRB104 06316 LNS 16351 b1    Section 10. Board duties and powers.2    (a) The Board may regulate the conduct of fantasy contest 3operators under this Act.4    (b) The Board shall adopt any rules the Board considers 5necessary for the successful implementation, administration, 6and enforcement of this Act. The Board shall adopt rules no 7later than 180 days after the effective date of this Act. Rules 8proposed by the Board may be adopted as emergency rules under 9Section 5-45 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act.10    (c) The Board shall levy and collect all fees, surcharges, 11civil penalties, and, on adjusted gross fantasy contest 12receipts imposed under this Act, monthly taxes as follows:13        (1) All registration and renewal fees collected under 14    this Act shall be deposited and distributed as follows:15            (A) 85% of fees shall be deposited into the State 16        Gaming Fund and used for the administration of this 17        Act; and18            (B) 15% of fees shall be paid, subject to 19        appropriation by the General Assembly, to the 20        Department of Human Services for administration of 21        programs for the treatment of compulsive gambling.22        (2) All taxes collected under Section 40 shall be 23    deposited into the Common School Fund.24        (3) All civil penalties levied as a direct result of 25    violations of this Act, less any costs incurred by the   SB1224- 5 -LRB104 06316 LNS 16351 b1    Board during the course of investigation which resulted in 2    the civil penalty, shall be paid, subject to appropriation 3    by the General Assembly, to the Department of Human 4    Services for administration of programs for the treatment 5    of compulsive gambling. 6    (d) The Board shall require fantasy contest operators to 7comply with the anti-money laundering standards, as defined by 8the federal Bank Secrecy Act of 1970 and the Anti-Money 9Laundering Act of 2020.10    (e) The Board shall verify that fantasy contest operators 11establish technical and operational measures to prevent 12underage participation in a fantasy contest.13    (f) The Board shall verify that fantasy contest operators 14deploy identity verification procedures, which may require the 15use of a reputable independent third party that is in the 16business of verifying an individual's personally identifiable 17information and can detect potential prohibited participants.18    (g) The Board shall verify that fantasy contest operators 19employ mechanisms on the operator's platform that are designed 20to detect and prevent unauthorized accounts and to detect and 21prevent fraud, money laundering, and collusion.22    (h) The Board shall require the use of geolocation 23technology to verify that a participant is not accessing the 24platform from a restricted jurisdiction.25    (i) The Board shall adopt rules establishing compulsive 26and problem gambling standards for fantasy contest operators   SB1224- 6 -LRB104 06316 LNS 16351 b1that are consistent with this Act.2    (j) The Board may exercise any other powers necessary to 3enforce the provisions of this Act that it regulates and the 4rules of the Board.5    (k) The Board and fantasy contest operator licensees may 6cooperate with investigations conducted by law enforcement 7agencies, including, but not limited to, providing and 8facilitating the provision of account-level entry and 9participation information.10    (l) A fantasy contest operator licensee shall make all 11reasonable efforts to promptly notify the Board of any 12information relating to:13        (1) a confirmed breach of the relevant sport's 14    governing body's internal rules and codes of conduct 15    pertaining to participation in real-money fantasy 16    contests;17        (2) any conduct that corrupts any outcome related to a 18    sports event or sports events for purposes of financial 19    gain, including match fixing; and20        (3) confirmed illegal activities, including use of 21    funds derived from illegal activity, entries to conceal or 22    launder funds derived from illegal activity, 23    multi-accounting, and using false identification. 24    Section 15. License.25    (a) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, a person   SB1224- 7 -LRB104 06316 LNS 16351 b1may not offer fantasy contests in this State unless the person 2is licensed by the Board as a fantasy contest operator.3    (b) An applicant for a license issued under this Act shall 4submit an application to the Board in the form the Board 5requires. The applicant shall submit fingerprints for a 6national criminal history record check by a law enforcement 7agency. The fingerprints shall be furnished by the applicant's 8owners, officers, and directors (if a corporation), managers 9and members (if a limited liability company), and partners (if 10a partnership). The fingerprints shall be accompanied by a 11signed authorization for the release of information by the law 12enforcement agency. The Board may require additional 13background checks on licensees when they apply for license 14renewal, and an applicant convicted of a disqualifying offense 15shall not be licensed. This subsection does not require an 16applicant or individual who has submitted to a national 17criminal history record check in this State or any other state 18within the 12 months before submitting the application to 19resubmit to another criminal history record check if the 20applicant or individual submits the results of the previous 21criminal history record check and affirms that there has been 22no material change in the criminal history since the time of 23the criminal history record check.24    (c) The information required by the Board shall include 25documentation of all of the following:26        (1) The name of the applicant.  SB1224- 8 -LRB104 06316 LNS 16351 b1        (2) The location of the applicant's principal place of 2    business.3        (3) The applicant's contact information.4        (4) The applicant's social security number or, if 5    applicable, the applicant's federal tax identification 6    number.7        (5) The name and address of each individual that holds 8    a 10% or more ownership interest in the applicant or in 9    shares of the applicant.10        (6) The applicant's criminal record, if any, or, if 11    the applicant is a business entity, on request, any 12    criminal record of an individual who is a director, 13    officer, or key employee of the applicant or any 14    individual who has a 10% or more ownership interest in the 15    applicant.16        (7) Any ownership interest that a director, officer, 17    key employee, or individual owner of 10% or more of the 18    applicant holds in a business that is or was a fantasy 19    contest operator or similar entity in any jurisdiction.20        (8) An identification of any business in which an 21    applicant or a director, officer, key employee, or 22    individual owner of 10% or more of the applicant has an 23    equity interest of 5% or more. If a business has been 24    identified under this paragraph, documentation must be 25    provided showing the state in which the business is 26    incorporated or registered, if applicable.  SB1224- 9 -LRB104 06316 LNS 16351 b1        (9) Whether an applicant, director, officer, key 2    employee, or individual owner of 10% or more of the 3    applicant has ever applied for or been granted any 4    license, registration, or certificate issued by a 5    licensing authority in this State or any other 6    jurisdiction for a gaming activity.7        (10) Whether an applicant or a director, officer, key 8    employee, or individual owner of 10% or more of the 9    applicant has filed or been served with a complaint or 10    other notice filed by a public body regarding the 11    delinquency in payment of or dispute over filings 12    concerning the payment of any tax required under federal, 13    State, or local law, including the amount of tax, the type 14    of tax, the taxing agency, and the time periods involved.15        (11) Information sufficient to show, as determined by 16    the Board, that the applicant can meet the requirements of 17    procedures submitted by the applicant under the Act and 18    under any rules adopted under this Act.19        (12) The Board may adopt rules to establish additional 20    qualifications and requirements to preserve the integrity 21    and security of fantasy contests in this State and to 22    promote and maintain a competitive fantasy sports market.23    (d) On receipt of a completed application and the required 24fee, the Board shall conduct the necessary background 25investigation to determine if the applicant meets the 26qualifications for licensure. On completion of the necessary   SB1224- 10 -LRB104 06316 LNS 16351 b1background investigation, the Board shall either issue a 2license or deny the application. If the application for 3licensure is denied, a statement setting forth the grounds for 4denial shall be forwarded to the applicant together with all 5other documents relied on by the Board, to the extent allowed 6by law. 7    Section 20. Fantasy contests.8    (a) Any fantasy contest conducted under this Act does not 9constitute gambling for any purpose, including under Article 1028 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012.11    (b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 12the operation of fantasy contests is only lawful when 13conducted in accordance with the provisions of this Act.14    (c) A person participating in a fantasy contest under this 15Act shall be at least 21 years of age.16    (d) A licensee under this Act may only accept an entry from 17a person physically located in the State. A fantasy contest 18operator must use a geolocation system to ensure that a 19participant is physically present in the State when 20participating in the fantasy contest unless otherwise 21authorized by the Board.22    (e) This Act shall be construed liberally to promote the 23general welfare of the public and integrity of the fantasy 24sports industry. However, the Board may not adopt rules 25limiting or regulating the rules or administration of an   SB1224- 11 -LRB104 06316 LNS 16351 b1individual fantasy contest, the statistical makeup of a 2fantasy contest, or the digital platform of a fantasy contest 3operator.4    (f) No licensed fantasy contest operator shall be forced 5to surrender or terminate its license prior to the date of 6expiration of the license solely by virtue of a change in the 7rules adopted under this Act. 8    Section 25. Issuance and denial of license. 9    (a) The initial license fee for a fantasy contest operator 10that operated in Illinois before the effective date of this 11Act shall be 8% of its adjusted gross fantasy contest receipts 12from the preceding calendar year or $1,000,000, whichever is 13less. The initial license fee for a fantasy contest operator 14that did not operate in Illinois for at least 12 months before 15the effective date of this Act shall be $10,000, except, if a 16fantasy contest operator has 10,000 or more fantasy contest 17participants in Illinois with an active account who 18participated in at least one fantasy contest with an entry 19fee, then the fantasy contest operator shall notify the Board 20and remit an application fee in the amount of $990,000 within 2110 days of notifying the Board. 22    (b) A fantasy contest operator that was offering contests 23to persons located in Illinois before the effective date of 24this Act pursuant to a bona fide attorney opinion letter may 25continue to offer contests to persons located in Illinois   SB1224- 12 -LRB104 06316 LNS 16351 b1until the fantasy contest operator's application for licensure 2has been approved or denied under this Act if the fantasy 3contest operator files an application for licensure with the 4Board within 90 days after the adoption of rules to effectuate 5this Act. 6    (c) Licenses issued by the Board shall remain in effect 7for 4 years. The Board shall establish a process for renewal 8with a renewal fee being 1% of the adjusted gross fantasy 9contests receipts for the preceding 4 years. 10    (d) A fantasy contest operator that allows its license to 11lapse, without requesting an extension of time to file, shall 12resubmit an initial application. An extension may be granted 13by the Board upon receipt of a written request. 14    (e) A fantasy contest operator applying for a license or 15renewal of a license may operate during the application period 16unless the Board has reasonable cause to believe that the 17fantasy contest operator is or may be in violation of the 18provisions of this Act and the Board requires the fantasy 19contest operator to suspend the operation of any fantasy 20contest until the license or renewal of a license is issued. 21    Section 30. Independent audits.22    (a) As part of its submission for licensure or renewal, an 23applicant shall: (i) contract with a certified public 24accountant to conduct an independent audit, consistent with 25generally accepted accounting principles; (ii) annually   SB1224- 13 -LRB104 06316 LNS 16351 b1contract with a testing laboratory recognized by the Board to 2verify compliance with the provisions of this Act; and (iii) 3submit to the Board a copy of the audit report and a report of 4the testing laboratory.5    (b) An initial applicant is not required to submit an 6audit report and report of the testing laboratory until the 24 7months following the issuance of a licensee to the licensee. 8    Section 35. Reporting prohibited conduct; investigations 9of prohibited conduct.10    (a) The Board shall investigate all reasonable allegations 11of prohibited conduct and refer any allegations it deems 12credible to the appropriate law enforcement entity.13    (b) The identity of any reporting person shall remain 14confidential unless that person authorizes disclosure of the 15person's identity or until the allegation of prohibited 16conduct is referred to law enforcement.17    (c) If the Board receives a complaint of prohibited 18conduct by an athlete, the Board shall notify the appropriate 19sports governing body of the athlete to review the complaint 20as provided by rule of the Board.21    (d) The Board shall adopt rules governing investigations 22of prohibited conduct and referrals to law enforcement 23entities. 24    Section 40. Tax. Beginning on July 1, 2025, for the   SB1224- 14 -LRB104 06316 LNS 16351 b1privilege of holding a license to operate fantasy contests 2under this Act, this State shall impose and collect a tax at a 3rate of at least 10% but not more than 15%, as determined by 4rule of the Board, of the fantasy contest operator's adjusted 5gross fantasy contests receipts. The accrual method of 6accounting shall be used for purposes of calculating the 7amount of the tax owed by the licensee. The fantasy contest 8operator shall submit to the Board, on or before the last day 9of each calendar month, a return indicating the amount of tax 10due under this Section for the previous calendar month as well 11as any other information the Board shall require by rule and 12shall remit to the Board payment of the tax due under this 13Section with that return. 14    Section 45. Compulsive gaming; voluntary self-exclusion.15    (a) Each licensee shall include a statement regarding 16obtaining assistance with real-money gaming problems on the 17licensee's portal, website, or computer or mobile application 18and on all marketing materials and advertisements of the 19licensee.20    (b) A resident, or nonresident if allowed to participate 21in fantasy contests, may voluntarily prohibit the resident or 22nonresident from establishing a fantasy contest account with a 23fantasy contest operator under this Act. The Board shall 24incorporate the voluntary self-exclusion program for fantasy 25contests into any existing self-exclusion program that it   SB1224- 15 -LRB104 06316 LNS 16351 b1operates on the effective date of this Act. 2    (c) If a self-excluded person participates in a fantasy 3contest, the fantasy contest operator shall report to the 4Board, at a minimum, the name of the self-excluded person, the 5date of participation, the amount or value of any money, 6prizes, or awards forfeited, if any, and any other action 7taken.8    (d) A fantasy contest operator may not pay any prize or 9award to a person who is on the Board's self-exclusion list. 10Any prize or award won by a person on the self-exclusion list 11is forfeited and shall be donated by the fantasy contest 12operator to the problem gaming charities or programs as 13identified and directed by the Board on a quarterly basis by 14the twenty-fifth day of the following month.15    (e) A fantasy contest operator shall develop and maintain 16a program to mitigate compulsive play and curtail compulsive 17play, which may be in conjunction with the Board. 18    Section 50. Supplier diversity goals for fantasy contest 19operators.20    (a) The Board shall require licensees under this Act to 21submit an annual report, in a searchable Adobe PDF format, on 22all procurement goals and actual spending for businesses owned 23by women, minorities, veterans, tribal and indigenous persons, 24and persons with disabilities and for all small business 25enterprises in the previous calendar year. These goals shall   SB1224- 16 -LRB104 06316 LNS 16351 b1be expressed as a percentage of the total work performed by the 2entity submitting the report, and the actual spending for all 3businesses owned by women, minorities, veterans, tribal and 4indigenous persons, and persons with disabilities and for all 5small business enterprises shall also be expressed as a 6percentage of the total work performed by the entity 7submitting the report. The initial report shall be due one 8year after the effective date of this Act and once every 2 9years thereafter.10    (b) Each licensee in its annual report shall include the 11following information:12        (1) an explanation of the plan for the next year to 13    increase participation;14        (2) an explanation of the plan to increase the goals;15        (3) the areas of procurement each licensee shall be 16    actively seeking more participation in the next year;17        (4) an outline of the plan to alert and encourage 18    potential vendors in that area to seek business from the 19    licensee;20        (5) an explanation of the challenges faced in finding 21    quality vendors and offer any suggestions for what the 22    Board could do to be helpful to identify those vendors;23        (6) a list of the certifications the licensee 24    recognizes;25        (7) the point of contact for any potential vendor who 26    wishes to do business with the licensee and explain the   SB1224- 17 -LRB104 06316 LNS 16351 b1    process for a vendor to enroll with the licensee as a 2    businesses owned by women, minorities, veterans, tribal 3    and indigenous persons, or persons with disabilities; and4        (8) any particular success stories to encourage other 5    licensees to emulate best practices.6    (c) Each annual report shall include as much 7State-specific data as possible. If the submitting entity does 8not submit State-specific data, then the licensee shall 9include any national data it does have and explain why it could 10not submit State-specific data and how it intends to do so in 11future reports, if possible.12    (d) Each annual report shall include the rules, 13regulations, and definitions used for the procurement goals in 14the licensee's annual report. 15    Section 100. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is 16amended by adding Section 5-45.65 as follows: 17    (5 ILCS 100/5-45.65 new)18    Sec. 5-45.65. Emergency rulemaking; Illinois Gaming Board. 19To provide for the expeditious and timely implementation of 20this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, emergency 21rules implementing the Fantasy Sports Consumer Protection Act 22may be adopted in accordance with Section 5-45 by the Illinois 23Gaming Board. The adoption of emergency rules authorized by 24Section 5-45 and this Section is deemed to be necessary for the   SB1224- 18 -LRB104 06316 LNS 16351 b1public interest, safety, and welfare.2    This Section is repealed one year after the effective date 3of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 4    Section 105. The Sports Wagering Act is amended by 5changing Section 25-10 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 45/25-10)7    Sec. 25-10. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    "Adjusted gross sports wagering receipts" means a master 9sports wagering licensee's gross sports wagering receipts, 10less winnings paid to wagerers in such games.11    "Athlete" means any current or former professional athlete 12or collegiate athlete.13    "Board" means the Illinois Gaming Board.14    "Covered persons" includes athletes; umpires, referees, 15and officials; personnel associated with clubs, teams, 16leagues, and athletic associations; medical professionals 17(including athletic trainers) who provide services to athletes 18and players; and the family members and associates of these 19persons where required to serve the purposes of this Act.20    "Department" means the Department of the Lottery.21    "Gaming facility" means a facility at which gambling 22operations are conducted under the Illinois Gambling Act, 23pari-mutuel wagering is conducted under the Illinois Horse 24Racing Act of 1975, or sports wagering is conducted under this   SB1224- 19 -LRB104 06316 LNS 16351 b1Act.2    "Official league data" means statistics, results, 3outcomes, and other data related to a sports event obtained 4pursuant to an agreement with the relevant sports governing 5body, or an entity expressly authorized by the sports 6governing body to provide such information to licensees, that 7authorizes the use of such data for determining the outcome of 8tier 2 sports wagers on such sports events.9    "Organization licensee" has the meaning given to that term 10in the Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975.11    "Owners licensee" means the holder of an owners license 12under the Illinois Gambling Act.13    "Person" means an individual, partnership, committee, 14association, corporation, or any other organization or group 15of persons.16    "Personal biometric data" means an athlete's information 17derived from DNA, heart rate, blood pressure, perspiration 18rate, internal or external body temperature, hormone levels, 19glucose levels, hydration levels, vitamin levels, bone 20density, muscle density, and sleep patterns.21    "Prohibited conduct" includes any statement, action, and 22other communication intended to influence, manipulate, or 23control a betting outcome of a sporting contest or of any 24individual occurrence or performance in a sporting contest in 25exchange for financial gain or to avoid financial or physical 26harm. "Prohibited conduct" includes statements, actions, and   SB1224- 20 -LRB104 06316 LNS 16351 b1communications made to a covered person by a third party, such 2as a family member or through social media. "Prohibited 3conduct" does not include statements, actions, or 4communications made or sanctioned by a team or sports 5governing body.6    "Qualified applicant" means an applicant for a license 7under this Act whose application meets the mandatory minimum 8qualification criteria as required by the Board.9    "Sporting contest" means a sports event or game on which 10the State allows sports wagering to occur under this Act. 11    "Sports event" means a professional sport or athletic 12event, a collegiate sport or athletic event, a motor race 13event, or any other event or competition of relative skill 14authorized by the Board under this Act.15    "Sports facility" means a facility that hosts sports 16events and holds a seating capacity greater than 17,000 17persons, except in a municipality with a population of more 18than 1,000,000, a seating capacity greater than 10,000 19persons.20    "Sports governing body" means the organization that 21prescribes final rules and enforces codes of conduct with 22respect to a sports event and participants therein. 23    "Sports wagering" means accepting wagers on sports events 24or portions of sports events, or on the individual performance 25statistics of athletes in a sports event or combination of 26sports events, by any system or method of wagering, including,   SB1224- 21 -LRB104 06316 LNS 16351 b1but not limited to, in person or over the Internet through 2websites and on mobile devices. "Sports wagering" includes, 3but is not limited to, single-game bets, teaser bets, parlays, 4over-under, moneyline, pools, exchange wagering, in-game 5wagering, in-play bets, proposition bets, and straight bets. 6"Sports wagering" does not include fantasy contests as that 7term is defined in Section 5 of the Fantasy Sports Consumer 8Protection Act. 9    "Sports wagering account" means a financial record 10established by a master sports wagering licensee for an 11individual patron in which the patron may deposit and withdraw 12funds for sports wagering and other authorized purchases and 13to which the master sports wagering licensee may credit 14winnings or other amounts due to that patron or authorized by 15that patron.16    "Tier 1 sports wager" means a sports wager that is 17determined solely by the final score or final outcome of the 18sports event and is placed before the sports event has begun. 19    "Tier 2 sports wager" means a sports wager that is not a 20tier 1 sports wager.21    "Wager" means a sum of money or thing of value risked on an 22uncertain occurrence.23    "Winning bidder" means a qualified applicant for a master 24sports wagering license chosen through the competitive 25selection process under Section 25-45.26(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 102-689, eff. 12-17-21.)   SB1224- 22 -LRB104 06316 LNS 16351 b1    Section 110. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 2changing Sections 28-1 and 28-3 as follows: 3    (720 ILCS 5/28-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 28-1)4    Sec. 28-1. Gambling. 5    (a) A person commits gambling when he or she:6        (1) knowingly plays a game of chance or skill for 7    money or other thing of value, unless excepted in 8    subsection (b) of this Section;9        (2) knowingly makes a wager upon the result of any 10    game, contest, or any political nomination, appointment or 11    election;12        (3) knowingly operates, keeps, owns, uses, purchases, 13    exhibits, rents, sells, bargains for the sale or lease of, 14    manufactures or distributes any gambling device;15        (4) contracts to have or give himself or herself or 16    another the option to buy or sell, or contracts to buy or 17    sell, at a future time, any grain or other commodity 18    whatsoever, or any stock or security of any company, where 19    it is at the time of making such contract intended by both 20    parties thereto that the contract to buy or sell, or the 21    option, whenever exercised, or the contract resulting 22    therefrom, shall be settled, not by the receipt or 23    delivery of such property, but by the payment only of 24    differences in prices thereof; however, the issuance,   SB1224- 23 -LRB104 06316 LNS 16351 b1    purchase, sale, exercise, endorsement or guarantee, by or 2    through a person registered with the Secretary of State 3    pursuant to Section 8 of the Illinois Securities Law of 4    1953, or by or through a person exempt from such 5    registration under said Section 8, of a put, call, or 6    other option to buy or sell securities which have been 7    registered with the Secretary of State or which are exempt 8    from such registration under Section 3 of the Illinois 9    Securities Law of 1953 is not gambling within the meaning 10    of this paragraph (4);11        (5) knowingly owns or possesses any book, instrument 12    or apparatus by means of which bets or wagers have been, or 13    are, recorded or registered, or knowingly possesses any 14    money which he has received in the course of a bet or 15    wager;16        (6) knowingly sells pools upon the result of any game 17    or contest of skill or chance, political nomination, 18    appointment or election;19        (7) knowingly sets up or promotes any lottery or 20    sells, offers to sell or transfers any ticket or share for 21    any lottery;22        (8) knowingly sets up or promotes any policy game or 23    sells, offers to sell or knowingly possesses or transfers 24    any policy ticket, slip, record, document or other similar 25    device;26        (9) knowingly drafts, prints or publishes any lottery   SB1224- 24 -LRB104 06316 LNS 16351 b1    ticket or share, or any policy ticket, slip, record, 2    document or similar device, except for such activity 3    related to lotteries, bingo games and raffles authorized 4    by and conducted in accordance with the laws of Illinois 5    or any other state or foreign government;6        (10) knowingly advertises any lottery or policy game, 7    except for such activity related to lotteries, bingo games 8    and raffles authorized by and conducted in accordance with 9    the laws of Illinois or any other state;10        (11) knowingly transmits information as to wagers, 11    betting odds, or changes in betting odds by telephone, 12    telegraph, radio, semaphore or similar means; or knowingly 13    installs or maintains equipment for the transmission or 14    receipt of such information; except that nothing in this 15    subdivision (11) prohibits transmission or receipt of such 16    information for use in news reporting of sporting events 17    or contests; or18        (12) knowingly establishes, maintains, or operates an 19    Internet site that permits a person to play a game of 20    chance or skill for money or other thing of value by means 21    of the Internet or to make a wager upon the result of any 22    game, contest, political nomination, appointment, or 23    election by means of the Internet. This item (12) does not 24    apply to activities referenced in items (6), (6.1), (8), 25    (8.1), and (15), and (16) of subsection (b) of this 26    Section.   SB1224- 25 -LRB104 06316 LNS 16351 b1    (b) Participants in any of the following activities shall 2not be convicted of gambling:3        (1) Agreements to compensate for loss caused by the 4    happening of chance including without limitation contracts 5    of indemnity or guaranty and life or health or accident 6    insurance.7        (2) Offers of prizes, award or compensation to the 8    actual contestants in any bona fide contest for the 9    determination of skill, speed, strength or endurance or to 10    the owners of animals or vehicles entered in such contest.11        (3) Pari-mutuel betting as authorized by the law of 12    this State.13        (4) Manufacture of gambling devices, including the 14    acquisition of essential parts therefor and the assembly 15    thereof, for transportation in interstate or foreign 16    commerce to any place outside this State when such 17    transportation is not prohibited by any applicable Federal 18    law; or the manufacture, distribution, or possession of 19    video gaming terminals, as defined in the Video Gaming 20    Act, by manufacturers, distributors, and terminal 21    operators licensed to do so under the Video Gaming Act.22        (5) The game commonly known as "bingo", when conducted 23    in accordance with the Bingo License and Tax Act.24        (6) Lotteries when conducted by the State of Illinois 25    in accordance with the Illinois Lottery Law. This 26    exemption includes any activity conducted by the   SB1224- 26 -LRB104 06316 LNS 16351 b1    Department of Revenue to sell lottery tickets pursuant to 2    the provisions of the Illinois Lottery Law and its rules.3        (6.1) The purchase of lottery tickets through the 4    Internet for a lottery conducted by the State of Illinois 5    under the program established in Section 7.12 of the 6    Illinois Lottery Law. 7        (7) Possession of an antique slot machine that is 8    neither used nor intended to be used in the operation or 9    promotion of any unlawful gambling activity or enterprise. 10    For the purpose of this subparagraph (b)(7), an antique 11    slot machine is one manufactured 25 years ago or earlier.12        (8) Raffles and poker runs when conducted in 13    accordance with the Raffles and Poker Runs Act.14        (8.1) The purchase of raffle chances for a raffle 15    conducted in accordance with the Raffles and Poker Runs 16    Act. 17        (9) Charitable games when conducted in accordance with 18    the Charitable Games Act.19        (10) Pull tabs and jar games when conducted under the 20    Illinois Pull Tabs and Jar Games Act.21        (11) Gambling games when authorized by the Illinois 22    Gambling Act.23        (12) Video gaming terminal games at a licensed 24    establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, licensed 25    large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 26    establishment, or licensed veterans establishment when   SB1224- 27 -LRB104 06316 LNS 16351 b1    conducted in accordance with the Video Gaming Act. 2        (13) Games of skill or chance where money or other 3    things of value can be won but no payment or purchase is 4    required to participate. 5        (14) Savings promotion raffles authorized under 6    Section 5g of the Illinois Banking Act, Section 7008 of 7    the Savings Bank Act, Section 42.7 of the Illinois Credit 8    Union Act, Section 5136B of the National Bank Act (12 9    U.S.C. 25a), or Section 4 of the Home Owners' Loan Act (12 10    U.S.C. 1463). 11        (15) Sports wagering when conducted in accordance with 12    the Sports Wagering Act. 13        (16) Fantasy contest wagering when conducted in 14    accordance with the Fantasy Sports Consumer Protection 15    Act. 16    (c) Sentence.17    Gambling is a Class A misdemeanor. A second or subsequent 18conviction under subsections (a)(3) through (a)(12), is a 19Class 4 felony.20    (d) Circumstantial evidence.21    In prosecutions under this Section circumstantial evidence 22shall have the same validity and weight as in any criminal 23prosecution.24(Source: P.A. 101-31, Article 25, Section 25-915, eff. 256-28-19; 101-31, Article 35, Section 35-80, eff. 6-28-19; 26101-109, eff. 7-19-19; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.)   SB1224- 28 -LRB104 06316 LNS 16351 b1    (720 ILCS 5/28-3)  (from Ch. 38, par. 28-3)2    Sec. 28-3. Keeping a gambling place. A "gambling place" is 3any real estate, vehicle, boat, or any other property 4whatsoever used for the purposes of gambling other than 5gambling conducted in the manner authorized by the Illinois 6Gambling Act, the Sports Wagering Act, or the Video Gaming 7Act, or the Fantasy Sports Consumer Protection Act. Any person 8who knowingly permits any premises or property owned or 9occupied by him or under his control to be used as a gambling 10place commits a Class A misdemeanor. Each subsequent offense 11is a Class 4 felony. When any premises is determined by the 12circuit court to be a gambling place:13        (a) Such premises is a public nuisance and may be 14    proceeded against as such, and15        (b) All licenses, permits or certificates issued by 16    the State of Illinois or any subdivision or public agency 17    thereof authorizing the serving of food or liquor on such 18    premises shall be void; and no license, permit or 19    certificate so cancelled shall be reissued for such 20    premises for a period of 60 days thereafter; nor shall any 21    person convicted of keeping a gambling place be reissued 22    such license for one year from his conviction and, after a 23    second conviction of keeping a gambling place, any such 24    person shall not be reissued such license, and25        (c) Such premises of any person who knowingly permits   SB1224- 29 -LRB104 06316 LNS 16351 b1    thereon a violation of any Section of this Article shall 2    be held liable for, and may be sold to pay any unsatisfied 3    judgment that may be recovered and any unsatisfied fine 4    that may be levied under any Section of this Article.5(Source: P.A. 101-31, Article 25, Section 25-915, eff. 66-28-19; 101-31, Article 35, Section 35-80, eff. 6-28-19; 7102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 8    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.